Washington statutes.
RCW 31.45.085

Loan application—Required statement—Rules.

(1)(a) In addition to other disclosures required by this chapter, the application for a small loan must include a statement that is substantially similar to the following: "At the time you repay this loan, you should have sufficient funds to meet your other financial obligations. If you cannot pay other bills because you are paying off this debt, you should go into the installment plan offered in connection with this loan."

(b) The statement in (a) of this subsection must be on the front page of the loan application and must be in at least twelve point type.

(2) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2009 c 510 s 5.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Liberal construction—2009 c 510: See note following RCW 31.45.010.